static/hunspell/28.01.2024/bash.aff
FLAG num
SFX 16 Y 125 # прилагательные A
SFX 16 0 тәр/116 . +Pl
SFX 16 0 төң/120 . +Gen
SFX 16 0 кә/122 . +Dat
SFX 16 0 кәрәк . +Dat+Comp
SFX 16 0 тө/124 . +Acc
SFX 16 0 тән/118 . +Abl
SFX 16 0 тә/122 . +Loc
SFX 16 0 тәрәк . +Loc+Comp
SFX 16 0 мөн/129 . +Pred1Sg
SFX 16 0 һөң/129 . +Pred2Sg
SFX 16 0 бөҙ/133 . +Pred1Pl
SFX 16 0 һөгөҙ/133 . +Pred2Pl
SFX 16 0 0/198 [^пкҡ]
SFX 16 0 0/212 [п]
SFX 16 0 0/213 [к]
SFX 16 0 0/214 [ҡ]
SFX 16 0 мө . +Q
SFX 16 0 мөлөр . +Q+Indf
SFX 16 0 төр . +Indf
SFX 16 0 сө . +Clt/сы
SFX 16 0 төкө/138 . +Poss
SFX 16 0 кәй/140 . +Dim
SFX 16 0 тәй/142 . +Der/дай
SFX 16 0 сә/144 . +Der/са
SFX 16 0 тәге/146 . +Der/дағы
SFX 16 0 тәгеләр/116 . +Der/дағы+Pl
SFX 16 0 лө/150 . +Der/лы
SFX 16 0 һөҙ/154 . +Abe
SFX 16 0 кәсә/156 . +Der/ҡаса
SFX 16 0 өрәктәр/116 [^пкҡ] +Comp+Pl
SFX 16 п бөрәктәр/116 [п] +Comp+Pl
SFX 16 к гөрәктәр/116 [к] +Comp+Pl
SFX 16 ҡ ғөрәктәр/116 [ҡ] +Comp+Pl
SFX 16 0 өрәктең/118 [^пкҡ] +Comp+Gen
SFX 16 п бөрәктең/118 [п] +Comp+Gen
SFX 16 к гөрәктең/118 [к] +Comp+Gen
SFX 16 ҡ ғөрәктең/118 [ҡ] +Comp+Gen
SFX 16 0 өрәккә/122 [^пкҡ] +Comp+Dat
SFX 16 п бөрәккә/122 [п] +Comp+Dat
SFX 16 к гөрәккә/122 [к] +Comp+Dat
SFX 16 ҡ ғөрәккә/122 [ҡ] +Comp+Dat
SFX 16 0 өрәкте/122 [^пкҡ] +Comp+Acc
SFX 16 п бөрәкте/122 [п] +Comp+Acc
SFX 16 к гөрәкте/122 [к] +Comp+Acc
SFX 16 ҡ ғөрәкте/122 [ҡ] +Comp+Acc
SFX 16 0 өрәктән/118 [^пкҡ] +Comp+Abl
SFX 16 п бөрәктән/118 [п] +Comp+Abl
SFX 16 к гөрәктән/118 [к] +Comp+Abl
SFX 16 ҡ ғөрәктән/118 [ҡ] +Comp+Abl
SFX 16 0 өрәктә/122 [^пкҡ] +Comp+Loc
SFX 16 п бөрәктә/122 [п] +Comp+Loc
SFX 16 к гөрәктә/122 [к] +Comp+Loc
SFX 16 ҡ ғөрәктә/122 [ҡ] +Comp+Loc
SFX 16 0 өрәкмен/127 [^пкҡ] +Comp+Pred1Sg
SFX 16 п бөрәкмен/127 [п] +Comp+Pred1Sg
SFX 16 к гөрәкмен/127 [к] +Comp+Pred1Sg
SFX 16 ҡ ғөрәкмен/127 [ҡ] +Comp+Pred1Sg
SFX 16 0 өрәкһең/127 [^пкҡ] +Comp+Pred2Sg
SFX 16 п бөрәкһең/127 [п] +Comp+Pred2Sg
SFX 16 к гөрәкһең/127 [к] +Comp+Pred2Sg
SFX 16 ҡ ғөрәкһең/127 [ҡ] +Comp+Pred2Sg
SFX 16 0 өрәкбеҙ/131 [^пкҡ] +Comp+Pred1Pl
SFX 16 п бөрәкбеҙ/131 [п] +Comp+Pred1Pl
SFX 16 к гөрәкбеҙ/131 [к] +Comp+Pred1Pl
SFX 16 ҡ ғөрәкбеҙ/131 [ҡ] +Comp+Pred1Pl
SFX 16 0 өрәкһегеҙ/131 [^пкҡ] +Comp+Pred2Pl
SFX 16 п бөрәкһегеҙ/131 [п] +Comp+Pred2Pl
SFX 16 к гөрәкһегеҙ/131 [к] +Comp+Pred2Pl
SFX 16 ҡ ғөрәкһегеҙ/131 [ҡ] +Comp+Pred2Pl
SFX 16 0 өрәк/207 [^пкҡ] +Comp
SFX 16 п бөрәк/207 [п] +Comp
SFX 16 к гөрәк/207 [к] +Comp
SFX 16 ҡ ғөрәк/207 [ҡ] +Comp
SFX 16 0 өрәкме [^пкҡ] +Comp+Q
SFX 16 п бөрәкме [п] +Comp+Q
SFX 16 к гөрәкме [к] +Comp+Q
SFX 16 ҡ ғөрәкме [ҡ] +Comp+Q
SFX 16 0 өрәкмелер [^пкҡ] +Comp+Q+Indf
SFX 16 п бөрәкмелер [п] +Comp+Q+Indf
SFX 16 к гөрәкмелер [к] +Comp+Q+Indf
SFX 16 ҡ ғөрәкмелер [ҡ] +Comp+Q+Indf
SFX 16 0 өрәктер [^пкҡ] +Comp+Indf
SFX 16 п бөрәктер [п] +Comp+Indf
SFX 16 к гөрәктер [к] +Comp+Indf
SFX 16 ҡ ғөрәктер [ҡ] +Comp+Indf
SFX 16 0 өрәксе [^пкҡ] +Comp+Clt/сы
SFX 16 п бөрәксе [п] +Comp+Clt/сы
SFX 16 к гөрәксе [к] +Comp+Clt/сы
SFX 16 ҡ ғөрәксе [ҡ] +Comp+Clt/сы
SFX 16 0 өрәктеке/136 [^пкҡ] +Comp+Poss
SFX 16 п бөрәктеке/136 [п] +Comp+Poss
SFX 16 к гөрәктеке/136 [к] +Comp+Poss
SFX 16 ҡ ғөрәктеке/136 [ҡ] +Comp+Poss
SFX 16 0 өрәккәй/140 [^пкҡ] +Comp+Dim
SFX 16 п бөрәккәй/140 [п] +Comp+Dim
SFX 16 к гөрәккәй/140 [к] +Comp+Dim
SFX 16 ҡ ғөрәккәй/140 [ҡ] +Comp+Dim
SFX 16 0 өрәктәй/142 [^пкҡ] +Comp+Der/дай
SFX 16 п бөрәктәй/142 [п] +Comp+Der/дай
SFX 16 к гөрәктәй/142 [к] +Comp+Der/дай
SFX 16 ҡ ғөрәктәй/142 [ҡ] +Comp+Der/дай
SFX 16 0 өрәксә/144 [^пкҡ] +Comp+Der/са
SFX 16 п бөрәксә/144 [п] +Comp+Der/са
SFX 16 к гөрәксә/144 [к] +Comp+Der/са
SFX 16 ҡ ғөрәксә/144 [ҡ] +Comp+Der/са
SFX 16 0 өрәктәге/146 [^пкҡ] +Comp+Der/дағы
SFX 16 п бөрәктәге/146 [п] +Comp+Der/дағы
SFX 16 к гөрәктәге/146 [к] +Comp+Der/дағы
SFX 16 ҡ ғөрәктәге/146 [ҡ] +Comp+Der/дағы
SFX 16 0 өрәктәгеләр/116 [^пкҡ] +Comp+Der/дағы+Pl
SFX 16 п бөрәктәгеләр/116 [п] +Comp+Der/дағы+Pl
SFX 16 к гөрәктәгеләр/116 [к] +Comp+Der/дағы+Pl
SFX 16 ҡ ғөрәктәгеләр/116 [ҡ] +Comp+Der/дағы+Pl
SFX 16 0 өрәкле/148 [^пкҡ] +Comp+Der/лы
SFX 16 п бөрәкле/148 [п] +Comp+Der/лы
SFX 16 к гөрәкле/148 [к] +Comp+Der/лы
SFX 16 ҡ ғөрәкле/148 [ҡ] +Comp+Der/лы
SFX 16 0 өрәкһеҙ/152 [^пкҡ] +Comp+Abe
SFX 16 п бөрәкһеҙ/152 [п] +Comp+Abe
SFX 16 к гөрәкһеҙ/152 [к] +Comp+Abe
SFX 16 ҡ ғөрәкһеҙ/152 [ҡ] +Comp+Abe
SFX 16 0 өрәккәсә/156 [^пкҡ] +Comp+Der/ҡаса
SFX 16 п бөрәккәсә/156 [п] +Comp+Der/ҡаса
SFX 16 к гөрәккәсә/156 [к] +Comp+Der/ҡаса
SFX 16 ҡ ғөрәккәсә/156 [ҡ] +Comp+Der/ҡаса
