static/hunspell/28.01.2024/bash.dic
бөлдөк/16	[A]
өрпөлдөк/16	[A]
өҙөк/16	[A]
өҙөк-өҙөк/16	[A]
айырым-өҙөк/16	[A]
төҙөк/16	[A]
һөҙөк/16	[A]
төржөк/16	[A]
өйөк/16	[A]
бөйөк/16	[A]
бөйөк-бөйөк/16	[A]
көҙлөк/16	[A]
өйлөк/16	[A]
көйөклөк/16	[A]
мөшкөллөк/16	[A]
бөгөнлөк/16	[A]
көнлөк/16	[A]
бөлөк/16	[A]
көндөҙгөлөк/16	[A]
көҙгөлөк/16	[A]
өлгөлөк/16	[A]
бөгөнгөлөк/16	[A]
көплөк/16	[A]
төплөк/16	[A]
өҙөрлөк/16	[A]
йөҙөрлөк/16	[A]
төҙөрлөк/16	[A]
сөйөрлөк/16	[A]
һөйөрлөк/16	[A]
көлөрлөк/16	[A]
һөйөнөрлөк/16	[A]
төшөнөрлөк/16	[A]
өлгөрөрлөк/16	[A]
төңөлдөрөрлөк/16	[A]
көйөндөрөрлөк/16	[A]
һөйөндөрөрлөк/16	[A]
төшөндөрөрлөк/16	[A]
көйҙөрөрлөк/16	[A]
йөрөрлөк/16	[A]
төкөрөрлөк/16	[A]
бөтөрөрлөк/16	[A]
һөрөрлөк/16	[A]
төшөрөрлөк/16	[A]
төпсөрлөк/16	[A]
өтөрлөк/16	[A]
бөтөрлөк/16	[A]
көтөрлөк/16	[A]
өркөтөрлөк/16	[A]
йөрөтөрлөк/16	[A]
өшөтөрлөк/16	[A]
өрҙөртөрлөк/16	[A]
төртөрлөк/16	[A]
шөрлөк/16	[A]
өшөрлөк/16	[A]
төшөрлөк/16	[A]
лөрпөк/16	[A]
йөрөк/16	[A]
көрөк/16	[A]
өсөк/16	[A]
бөрсөк/16	[A]
бөтөрсөк/16	[A]
көҫөк-көҫөк/16	[A]
төйтөк/16	[A]
өлтөк/16	[A]
өтөк/16	[A]
көтөк/16	[A]
өҙөк-төртөк/16	[A]
өстөк/16	[A]
һөмһөк/16	[A]
өшөк/16	[A]
төп/16	[A]
өҙгөс/16	[A]
өлдөргөс/16	[A]
көйҙөргөс/16	[A]
һөйҙөргөс/16	[A]
көддөс/16	[A]
ҡөддөс/16	[A]
бөкөс/16	[A]
мөкөс/16	[A]
төкөс/16	[A]
өткөс/16	[A]
йөрөткөс/16	[A]
өшөткөс/16	[A]
көлкөнөс/16	[A]
өркөнөс/16	[A]
көлөнөс/16	[A]
көйөҫ/16	[A]
дөрөҫ/16	[A]
дөп-дөрөҫ/16	[A]
төҫ/16	[A]
сөскөлт/16	[A]
наөмөт/16	[A]
хөсөт/16	[A]
көңгөрт/16	[A]
хөрт/16	[A]
өтөкөш/16	[A]
көлөш/16	[A]
төпсөнмөш/16	[A]
көмөш/16	[A]
лөпөш/16	[A]
төпөш/16	[A]
бөрөш/16	[A]
сөрөш/16	[A]
өтөрөш/16	[A]
шөрөш/16	[A]
бөтөш/16	[A]
